Arkansas, session 2025, SB200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-52-437(a)(2), concerning the definition
of "instructional materials" as it relates to the exemption of textbooks and
other instructional materials from the gross receipts tax, is amended to read
as follows:
(2) “Instructional materials” does not include:
(A) Items purchased or leased for use in:
(i) Interscholastic extracurricular activities; or
(ii) Administration or maintenance of a school; or
(B) Construction materials or supplies.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-52-437(b), concerning the conditions
under which textbooks and other instructional materials are exempt from the
gross receipts tax, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Textbooks, library books, and other instructional materials shall
be exempt from the gross receipts tax levied by this chapter if purchased or
*TNL045*
02/05/2025 1:50:02 PM TNL045

SB200
leased by:
(1) An Arkansas public school district or Arkansas public school
that receives state funding; or
(2) The State of Arkansas for free distribution to Arkansas
public school districts or Arkansas public schools.































02/05/2025 1:50:02 PM TNL045